Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 3. Licensing of Sport Fishing and Hunting.
Sec. 16.05.420.
License, tag, permit, and registration violations.

A false statement of a material fact in an application for a license, tag, permit, and sport fishing vessel registration issued under AS

16.05.330

—

16.05.430

voids the license, tag, permit, or registration for which the application is made.

A person may not make a false statement, or omit a material fact, in an application for a license, tag, permit, or sport fishing vessel registration issued under AS

16.05.330

—

16.05.430

. A person who without any culpable mental state makes a false statement as to the person’s identity or residency in an application for a license, tag, permit, or sport fishing vessel registration issued under AS

16.05.330

—

16.05.430

is guilty of a violation and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $300. A person who knowingly violates this subsection is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

A person to whom a license, tag, or sport fishing vessel registration has been issued under this chapter may not alter, change, loan, or transfer the license, tag, or sport fishing vessel registration. Except for a hunting permit originally awarded by drawing established by the Board of Game under AS

16.05.255(a)

that has been transferred or reissued under AS

16.05.404

, a person may not use a license, tag, or sport fishing vessel registration that has been issued under this chapter to another person.

History.

(§ 7 art II ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 16 ch 131 SLA 1960; am §§ 6, 7 ch 75 SLA 1964; am § 2 ch 32 SLA 1968; am § 4 ch 28 SLA 1990; am § 17 ch 30 SLA 1992; am § 27 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 112 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 70 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 18 SLA 2021)

Cross references. —

For penalties for class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035(b)(5)

and

12.55.135(a)

.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 3,
ch. 18, SLA 2021, the 2021 amendment of (c) of this section “applies to the transfer or reissuance of a hunting permit that was originally awarded before, on, or after July 14, 2021” subject to the requirements of
AS

16.05.404

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective July 14, 2021, in (c), added “Except for a hunting permit originally awarded by drawing established by the Board of Game under AS

16.05.255(a)

that has been transferred or reissued under AS

16.05.404

,” at the beginning of the second sentence, and made a related change.

Sec. 16.05.430.
Penalties.

Except as provided in AS

16.05.330(f)

,16.05.407(b) and (d),

16.05.408(b)

, and

16.05.420(b)

, a person who violates AS

16.05.330

—

16.05.420

or a regulation adopted under AS

16.05.330

—

16.05.420

is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both.

The proceeds of all fines shall be transmitted by the court to the proper state officer for deposit in the general fund of the state.

History.

(§ 10 art II ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 18 ch 131 SLA 1960; am § 28 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 5 ch 28 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 112 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 54 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 14, 2018, in (a) inserted “16.05.330(f)” at the beginning of the first list of code sections. Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 4, ch. 54, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 13, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 14, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.